Connecticut, session 2026, HB05256.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 2-14 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The General Assembly shall enact no special legislation relative to the
powers, organization and form of government of any town, city,
borough or other unit of local government unless requested by a town,
city, borough or other unit of local government, in the manner
hereinafter prescribed, to enact such special legislation. A resolution
requesting the General Assembly to enact special legislation and
specifying the purpose of such legislation shall be adopted: (1) By a two-
thirds vote of the council or board of directors in any town having such
a body; of the board of aldermen, council or body charged with the duty
of making annual appropriations in any city or consolidated town and
city; of the board of burgesses in any borough or consolidated town and
borough; or of the board of directors or district committee in any district;
or (2) by the board of selectmen or by a majority vote of the town
meeting or representative town meeting in any town not having a
council or board of directors. A request for the enactment of special
legislation by the General Assembly may also be initiated by a petition

House Bill No. 5256
specifying the purpose of such legislation and signed by not less than
ten per cent of the electors of the town, city, borough or other unit of
local government as determined by the last-completed registry list and
filed with the clerk of such town, city, borough or other unit of local
government. Upon the filing of such petition, such clerk shall proceed
forthwith to determine its sufficiency by comparing the names thereon
with those contained in such registry list and shall certify its sufficiency
or insufficiency. [Such clerk shall file with the Secretary of the State, not
later than ten days prior to the convening of any session of the General
Assembly in which such proposed legislation is to be introduced, a
certified copy of the resolution as adopted or the text of the petition as
signed.]
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-132 2 of 2